Utah statutes.
57-8a-109.   Limit on fee for approval of plans.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Lot plans" means plans:

(i)  for the construction or improvement of a lot; and

(ii)  that are required to be approved by the association before the lot construction or improvement may occur.

(b)  "Plan fee" means a fee that an association charges for review and approval of lot plans.

(2)  An association may not charge a plan fee that exceeds the actual cost of reviewing and approving the lot plans.



Enacted by Chapter 152, 2013 General Session

